Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8347.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative intent.
(1) The general assembly finds that enforcement of federal civil immigration law is a
federal function.
(2) This act is intended to decline voluntary participation in federal civil immigration
enforcement, pursuant to the Tenth Amendment of the United States Constitution, and consistent
with the anti-commandeering doctrine.
(3) Nothing in this act shall be construed to:
(i) Prohibit compliance with a judicial warrant or court order issued by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(ii) Prohibit communication of information regarding citizenship or immigration status as
otherwise required by law;
(iii) Interfere with the execution of federal law by federal officers acting within the scope
of their lawful authority; or
(iv) Prevent state or local cooperation in the investigation or prosecution of criminal
offenses. For the avoidance of doubt, immigration status alone, including status as an
undocumented individual resulting from unlawful entry, unlawful reentry, or failure to depart, or
lawful presence in the United States as a nonimmigrant visa holder, refugee, asylee, or lawful
permanent resident, shall not be considered a "criminal offense" or "violation of criminal law," as

used in this act.
SECTION 2. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 161.1
RESTRICTIONS ON STATE AND MUNICIPAL COOPERATION WITH CIVIL
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
42-161.1-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Administrative warrant" means a warrant of removal/deportation or a warrant for arrest
signed by an immigration agent, which is not a judicial warrant.
(2) "Assist" or "cooperate" means to expend state or local resources for the primary purpose
of facilitating civil immigration enforcement.
(3) "Civil immigration detainer" means a detainer issued by U.S. Immigration and Customs
Enforcement, a component of the Department of Homeland Security, pursuant to 8 CFR 287.7.
(4) "Civil immigration enforcement" means the investigation, detention, transfer, or
removal of noncitizens under federal immigration law.
(5) "Immigration agent" means any officer, employee, or authorized representative of a
federal agency charged with enforcement of federal civil immigration laws.
(6) "In custody" means detained, arrested, incarcerated, or otherwise deprived of liberty by
a law enforcement agency.
(7) "Judicial warrant" or "court order" means a lawful judicial warrant or court order signed
by a judge appointed pursuant to Article III of the United States Constitution, or a United States
district court magistrate, that authorizes the specific action requested.
(8) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the state or of a unit of local
government charged with enforcement of state, or municipal laws, or with managing custody of
detained persons in the state; or with probation and parole; and includes state and municipal
prosecutors, their employees and agents.
(9) "Law enforcement official" means any individual with the power to arrest or detain
individuals, including law enforcement officers, correctional officers, division of sheriffs,
probation officers, and others employed or designated by a law enforcement agency.
(10) "Non-public information" means information not otherwise available to the general
public through official public records or routine public access.
42-161.1-2. Limitations on use of state resources.
(a) No state agency, office, department, or other unit of state government, and no unit of
LC006165 - Page 2 of 5

local government, or their subdivisions, may enter into or renew any agreement under 8 U.S.C. §
1357(g) or any similar intergovernmental service agreement, contract, or policy, formal or
informal, for the purpose of civil immigration enforcement, processing, detention, housing, or
removal.
(b) Except as required by federal or state law, or upon presentation of a valid judicial
warrant or court order, no law enforcement agency, or law enforcement official acting in an official
capacity, shall:
(1) Participate in, assist, or cooperate with an immigration agent in the enforcement of civil
immigration laws;
(2) Provide an immigration agent nonconsensual access, whether in person, by telephone,
electronically, or otherwise, to any individual in the custody of the agency for purposes of civil
immigration enforcement interviews;
(3) Transfer or otherwise facilitate the transfer of any individual into the custody of an
immigration agent;
(4) Permit the use of personnel facilities, equipment, property, non-public information, or
other resources by an immigration agent for purposes of civil immigration enforcement;
(5) Allow immigration agents use of secure facilities, non-public office space, or non-
public law enforcement databases for civil immigration enforcement purposes;
(6) Disclose non-public information in response to a request from a federal immigration
agent regarding an individual in the custody of the agency for purposes of civil immigration
enforcement; or
(7) Provide advance notification of release dates, transfer dates, or custodial status changes
where such information is non-public and requested for purposes of civil immigration enforcement.
(c) A law enforcement agency, or law enforcement official acting in an official capacity,
may provide advance notice of a release date to a civil immigration officer only if the detainee is
charged with a capital offense.
(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude a law enforcement official from otherwise
executing that official's duties in investigating violations of criminal law and cooperating in such
investigations with federal and other law enforcement agencies.
42-161.1-3. No extension of custody.
(a) A law enforcement agency shall not detain an individual or extend an individual's
detention beyond the time the individual would otherwise be released solely for purposes of civil
immigration enforcement, absent a judicial warrant or court order.
(b) A civil immigration detainer, administrative warrant, or request for notification shall
LC006165 - Page 3 of 5

not constitute probable cause for continued detention under Rhode Island law.
42-161.1-4. Remedies.
(a) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action for
declaratory and equitable relief.
(b) A prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
42-161.1-5. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof, is held invalid, such
determination shall not affect the provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given
effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this chapter are
severable.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006165
========
LC006165 - Page 4 of 5